Massachusetts, session 194th, S3120.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Massachusetts
Department of Youth Services shall establish a sick leave bank for Edward Suber, an employee
of the Department. Any employee of the Department of Youth Services may voluntarily
contribute one or more sick, personal, or vacation days to the sick leave bank for use by Edward
Suber. If Edward Suber terminates employment with the Department or requests to dissolve the
sick leave bank, any remaining time in the sick leave bank shall be transferred to the Department
of Youth Service paid leave bank. Sick leave bank days shall not be used for absences unrelated
to the illness or disability that necessitated the establishment of the sick leave bank as determined
by the Department.
of 1